Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 8. PUBLIC RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

SUBTITLE D. JUDICIAL RETIREMENT SYSTEM OF TEXAS PLAN ONE

CHAPTER 835. ADMINISTRATION

SUBCHAPTER A. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 835.001. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION. The board of trustees of the Employees Retirement System of Texas is responsible for the general administration and operation of the retirement system.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 45.001 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 835.002. RULEMAKING. Subject to the limitations of this subtitle, the board of trustees may adopt rules and provide for forms as it finds necessary for the administration of the retirement system.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 45.002 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 835.003. DEPOSIT OF CERTAIN FUNDS. (a) The retirement system shall deposit membership fees paid as required by Section 832.002 in the expense fund of the Employees Retirement System of Texas, to compensate for the costs of administering this retirement system.

(b) The retirement system shall deposit in the general revenue fund all other amounts paid to the system.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 45.003 and amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

SUBCHAPTER B. CONTRIBUTIONS

Sec. 835.101. MEMBER CONTRIBUTIONS. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (c), each month the payroll officer responsible for paying the state compensation of a judicial officer who is a member of the retirement system shall deduct from the state compensation of the judicial officer a contribution computed at the rate required of a member of the employee class of the Employees Retirement System of Texas.

(b) Contributions deducted as provided by this section are deposited in the general revenue fund, where they are subject to appropriation as are other amounts in the fund.

(c) Except as provided by Section 835.1015, a member who accrues 20 years of service credit in the retirement system ceases making contributions under this section.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 602, Sec. 12, Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 45.101 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1240, Sec. 4, eff. Jan. 1, 2002.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1033 (H.B. 1114), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 835.1015. CONTRIBUTIONS AFTER 20 YEARS OF SERVICE CREDIT. (a) A judicial officer who is a member of the retirement system and who accrues 20 years of service credit in the retirement system may elect to make contributions for each subsequent year of service credit that the member accrues by filing an application with the retirement system.

(b) A member who elects to make contributions under Subsection (a) shall contribute at the member contribution rate required under Section 840.102(a) multiplied by the member's state compensation for each payroll period in the manner provided by Sections 835.101(a) and (b).

(c) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308, Sec. 41(3), eff. September 1, 2009.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1033 (H.B. 1114), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (H.B. 2559), Sec. 41(3), eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1121 (H.B. 2384), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 835.102. STATE CONTRIBUTIONS. The legislature is obligated to appropriate the amount of money necessary to administer this subtitle for each fiscal year.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 45.102 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.